Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-806
Bondholders' rights.

Any county which shall have issued its bonds pursuant to sections 10-801 to 10-807 shall be estopped from pleading want of consideration therefor, and the proper officers of such county may be compelled by mandamus, or otherwise, to levy the tax herein authorized.

Laws 1913, c. 229, § 7, p. 665;

R.S.1913, § 477;

C.S.1922, § 394;

C.S.1929, § 11-1007;

R.S.1943, § 10-806.